scripts/cap.script
#***** cap.script *****
# Th. Fransen, 21/08/19
# Capitalisation of initial letters

echo >>> Opening 'cap.script' ...

clear stack

echo >>> Defining capitalisation rules ...

define capRule [
# No capitalisation double non-lenited anlaut consonants 
[ l -> L || .#. _ \l ] .o. 
[ m -> M || .#. _ \m ] .o. 
[ n -> N || .#. _ \n ] .o. 
[ r -> R || .#. _ \r ] .o. 

[ b -> B , c -> C , d -> D , f -> F , g -> G , h -> H , l -> L ,p -> P , s -> S , t -> T , a -> A , á -> Á ,  e -> E , é -> É , i -> I , í -> Í , o -> O , ó -> Ó , u -> U , ú -> Ú , æ -> Æ , ǽ -> Ǽ || .#. _  ]
] ;
